Utah statutes.
76-3-406.5.   Aggravating factors in imprisonment for certain criminal homicide cases.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Cohabitant" has the same definition as in Section 78B-7-102.

(b)  "Position of trust" includes the position of a spouse, parent, or cohabitant.

(2)  It is an aggravating factor that the person occupied a position of trust in relation to the victim.

(3)  The Board of Pardons and Parole shall consider the aggravating factor in Subsection (2) in determining the length of imprisonment for a person convicted of:

(a)  aggravated murder under Section 76-5-202;

(b)  murder under Section 76-5-203; or

(c)  manslaughter under Section 76-5-205.

(4)  The sentencing court shall consider the aggravating factor in Subsection (2) in sentencing a person convicted of manslaughter under Section 76-5-205.

